Utah statutes.
41-1a-904.   Retention of statements by dealers -- Inspection.
(1)  Each dealer  required to execute and furnish an odometer mileage
disclosure statement under Section 41-1a-902 shall retain at its primary place
of business for four years after each transfer of a motor vehicle each
statement that he receives and a legible copy of each statement that he issues
in connection with those transfers.
(2)  These statements shall be available for inspection by, and copies shall
be furnished to, any peace officer during reasonable business hours.
